Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 5.5
FAMILY PRESERVATION

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1991 and was not amended prior to 1993. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1993, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For the text of this article prior to 1993, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

26-5.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Family Preservation Act".

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2006, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-5.5-101 as it existed prior to 1993.

26-5.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Maintaining a family structure to the greatest degree possible is one of the fundamental goals that all state agencies must observe, and the state's intervention in family dynamics should not exceed that which is necessary to rectify the cause for intervention;

Out-of-home placement is often the most expensive and disruptive method of providing services to troubled families;

It is becoming increasingly difficult to attract foster parents for the number of children placed out of the home;

The principle of appropriate state intervention is a cornerstone of family preservation services. Such services, when properly targeted and administered, provide states with an opportunity to initiate the systemic reform of children, youth, and families public services by providing services that are family-focused, outcome-driven, and cost-efficient.

Family preservation programs implemented in other states, such as the "homebuilder's" model in the state of Washington, have resulted in improved family-functioning rates. Placement prevention rates of up to eighty-eight percent have been reported in some of the thirty-one states that have initiated some form of a family preservation program.

A statewide family preservation program may be financed to provide intensive services for families where a child is at risk of an out-of-home placement based on criteria established by the state board of human services and to provide phased-in services aimed at reunifying families where a child has been placed out of the home, where appropriate, by tapping into other available federal funds or through moneys realized from cost avoidance in prevention of placement;

On the basis of the foregoing, it is appropriate to enact the provisions of this article providing for the implementation of a statewide family preservation program that provides for immediate intensive services for at-risk families and phased-in services aimed at reunifying families, where appropriate, when the targeted families for intensive or reunification services have been served.

It is the general assembly's intent that the implementation and financing of the statewide family preservation program be consistent with applicable federal mandates, including any federal financial participation requirements, and that the implementation of the program not place this state at risk of losing federal funds received by the state for children, youth, and families services prior to the enactment of this article.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2006, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1055, § 6, effective May 4.

L. 97:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1024, § 46, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-5.5-102 as it existed prior to 1993.

26-5.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"At-risk family" means a family unit with a child who meets out-of-home placement criteria as established by the state board or who, without intervention, risks continued involvement with the child welfare system as established by the state board.

(1.5) Repealed.

"Family preservation services" means services or assistance that focuses on family strengths and includes services that empower a family by providing alternative problem-solving techniques, child-rearing practices, responses to living situations that create stress upon the family, and resources that are available as support systems for the family. Family preservation services include, but are not limited to services and resources described in section 26-5.5-104.

"Intensive services" means immediate, concentrated, and in-home crisis intervention by one or more family development specialists who assist a family in developing strengths to cope with family stress.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2007, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2705, § 266, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 12, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1) amended and (1.5) repealed, (HB 11-1196), ch. 160, pp. 552, 555, §§ 1, 7, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-5.5-104. Statewide family preservation program - creation - single state agency designated - program criteria established - available services - powers and duties of agencies - local oversight - feasibility report.

The executive directors of the departments of health care policy and financing and human services, through the promulgation of rules, may jointly develop, finance, and implement a statewide family preservation program, which program shall be fully implemented no later than July 1, 1996. The state department is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer the program in accordance with this article and applicable federal law.

The program shall be implemented as follows:

No later than January 1, 1996, services aimed at reunification of families shall, within available appropriations, be made available to appropriate families where a child has been placed out of the home;

No later than July 1, 1996, family preservation services shall, within available appropriations, be available to serve appropriate families who are involved in, or who are at risk of being involved in, the child welfare, mental heath, and juvenile justice systems.

Family preservation services shall, at a minimum, include the following:

Screening to determine the appropriateness of providing family preservation services, including intensive services and reunification services, to a family;

An assessment of the risk to a child and the needs of a child and the child's family, considering any special needs of a child and the cultural background of the family;

Appropriate intervention to meet the assessed needs of the child and the child's family, taking into account the geographical location of the family and available resources in such locale;

Referral to community services and support systems; and

Follow-up care, where appropriate.

Intensive services shall be available for an at-risk family in the family home, as deemed necessary by the county department. Intensive services shall include, at a minimum:

Family preservation services described in subsection (3) of this section; except that the screening of a family for intensive services shall occur within twenty-four hours after referral by the investigating or placement agency to decide the appropriateness of providing intensive services to the family where the child has been determined by the investigating or placement agency to be at imminent risk of out-of-home placement or at risk of continued involvement in the child welfare system;

Crisis intervention, including in-home counseling, by a case manager or case worker, which intervention shall be available on a twenty-four-hour basis;

Concentrated assistance in the development and enhancement of parenting skills, stress reduction, and problem-solving from a case manager or case worker; and

Individualized and group counseling.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 11, § 2, effective August 5, 2008.)

Intensive services shall be available to a family for a child who requires a more restrictive level of care but who may be maintained at a less restrictive out-of-home placement or in his or her own home with services for a period of time as determined by rule of the state department.

The state department of human services and county departments of human or social services may seek the assistance of any public or private entity in carrying out the duties set forth in this article 5.5. In addition, the state department may contract with any public or private entity in providing the services described in this article 5.5. Priority must be given to vendors who provide the most geographically and culturally relevant services.

On and after July 1, 1994, the executive director of the state department shall annually evaluate the statewide family preservation program and shall determine the overall effectiveness and cost-efficiency of the program. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before the first day of October of each year, the executive director of the state department shall report such findings and shall make recommended changes, including budgetary changes, to the program to the general assembly, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the governor. In evaluating the program, the executive director of the state department shall consider any recommendations made by the interagency family preservation commission in accordance with section 26-5.5-106. To the extent changes to the program may be made without requiring statutory amendment, the executive director may implement such changes, including changes recommended by the commission acting in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.

The inter-agency family preservation commission, established pursuant to section 26-5.5-106, shall be responsible for providing oversight of the local implementation of the statewide family preservation program. In providing oversight, the commission shall, on and after July 1, 1994, annually evaluate the overall effectiveness and cost-efficiency of the program and shall make recommended changes to the executive director of the state department. The commission shall submit to the executive director of the state department a report of its findings on or before the first day of September of each year.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2008, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

IP(4)(a) amended, p. 1055, § 7, effective May 4; (1) and (5) amended, pp. 2634, 2705, §§ 68, 267, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4) amended, p. 11, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(2)(b), IP(4)(a), (4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), and (4)(a)(III) amended, (HB 11-1196), ch. 160, pp. 552, 555, §§ 2, 8, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(6) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 523, § 12, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 448, § 123, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by sections 68 and 267 of House Bill 94-1029 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsections (1) and (5), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-5.5-105. Financing of family preservation program.

The implementation of the statewide family preservation program shall be subject to the availability of federal financial participation for emergency assistance under Title IV-A of the federal "Social Security Act", other available federal funds, appropriations from the general assembly, and moneys realized from avoiding costs related to out-of-home placements. In addition, the executive director of the state department is hereby authorized to accept any grants, donations, gifts, or contributions from any other private or public entity.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2010, § 1, effective July 1; entire section R&RE, p. 2004, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1056, § 8, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-5.5-105 as it existed prior to 1993.

26-5.5-106. Family preservation commission - establishment or designation - duties.

The governing body of each county or city and county shall establish a family preservation commission for the county or city and county to carry out the duties described in subsection (2) of this section. The commission shall be interdisciplinary and multiagency in composition; except that such commission shall include at least two members from the public at large. The governing body may designate an existing board or group to act as the commission. A group of counties may agree to designate a regional commission to act collectively as the commission for all of such counties. A family preservation commission may be consolidated with other local advisory boards pursuant to section 24-1.7-103, C.R.S.

It shall be the duty of each commission established or designated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to hold periodic meetings and evaluate the family preservation program within the county or city and county, and to identify any recommended changes to such program. On and after July 1, 1994, the commission shall submit an annual report to the executive director of the state department. The report shall consist of an evaluation of the overall effectiveness and cost-efficiency of the program and any recommended changes to such program. The report shall be submitted on or before the first day of September of each year.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2011, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1191, § 16, effective July 1.